Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,162
Employment as driver; employer;
duties; violation; penalty.

(1) Each employer shall require
prospective applicants for employment as a driver of a commercial motor vehicle
to provide the information required by section 60-4,161.

(2) No employer may knowingly
allow, require, permit, or authorize a driver to operate a commercial motor
vehicle in the United States in any of the following circumstances:

(a) During any period
in which the driver does not have a current commercial learner's permit or
commercial driver's license or does not have a commercial learner's permit
or commercial driver's license with the proper class or endorsements. An employer
may not use a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle who violates any
restriction on the driver's commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's
license;

(b)
During any period in which the driver has a commercial learner's permit or
commercial driver's license disqualified by a state, has lost the right to
operate a commercial motor vehicle in a state, or has been disqualified from
operating a commercial motor vehicle;

(c) During any period in which the driver has more
than one commercial learner's permit or commercial driver's license;

(d) During any period
in which the driver, the commercial motor vehicle he or she is operating,
or the motor carrier operation is subject to an out-of-service order; or

(e) In violation of a
federal, state, or local law or regulation pertaining to railroad-highway
grade crossings.

(3) Any employer who violates
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 112;

Laws 2002, LB 499, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 47.